Massachusetts, session 194th, H4672.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 55A of chapter 15 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 56 to 59, inclusive, the words “(6) 
review the progress of overall student achievement and; (7) evaluate student performance, school 
and district management, overall district governance and any other areas deemed necessary by 
the office” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- (6) evaluate the alignment of 
literacy instructional materials and curricula with department-recommended evidence-based 
literacy instruction and high-quality curricula, as those terms are defined in section 1E 1/2 of 
chapter 69; (7) review the progress of overall student achievement; and (8) evaluate student 
performance, school and district management, overall district governance and any other areas 
deemed necessary by the office. 
SECTION 2. Chapter 69 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 1E the following 2 sections:- 

of 10 
Section 1E 1/2. (a) As used in this section and section 1E 3/4, the following words shall, 
unless the context clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings: 
“Evidence-based literacy instruction”, literacy instruction that is: (i) grounded in 
scientific research methods; and (ii) demonstrated through well-designed and well-implemented 
studies to produce significant and positive effects on student learning outcomes.  
“Five research-based areas in reading instruction”, reading instruction that includes, but 
shall not be limited to, phonemic awareness, phonics, fluency, vocabulary and comprehension. 
“High-quality curriculum”, curriculum reviewed and approved by the department. 
(b) No curricula selected to meet a curriculum framework pursuant to section 1E for 
kindergarten through grade 3 literacy shall include implicit and incidental instruction in word 
reading, visual memorization of whole words, guessing from context and picture cues, also 
known as MSV or three-cueing. 
(c) Districts shall select high-quality curricula to meet the curriculum frameworks 
pursuant to section 1E for kindergarten through grade 3 literacy that: (i) include instruction in the 
five research-based areas in reading instruction; and (ii) utilize and are based upon evidence-
based literacy instruction. 
(d)(1) A district may apply to the department for a waiver to use kindergarten through 
grade 3 literacy instruction curriculum that does not appear on the department’s list of high-
quality curricula. 

of 10 
(2) In determining whether to approve a district’s waiver for a curriculum that is not 
already on the department’s list of high-quality curricula, the department shall assess whether the 
district’s curriculum utilizes evidence-based literacy instruction. 
(e)(1) A district may apply to the department for a waiver to use a kindergarten through 
grade 3 literacy instruction curriculum pilot program that utilizes curricula that the department 
has not yet reviewed to determine if it is evidence-based literacy instruction. 
(2) A district shall report to the department: (i) the degree to which the pilot’s 
instructional approach is supported by some degree of scientific research; (ii) the methodology of 
the pilot; (iii) the population that was instructed using the pilot curriculum and any demographic 
differences between that population and the district’s student body at large; (iv) the duration of 
any such pilot; and (v) any other considerations that the department deems relevant to the quality 
and fairness of the pilot program’s execution and impact on student learning. 
(3) In determining whether to approve a district’s application to participate in a pilot 
program pursuant to this subsection, the department shall assess the quality of the proposed pilot 
program, including, information received pursuant to paragraph (2). 
(4) Curriculum for a pilot program that is assessed and approved by the department and 
deemed to meet the requirements of this section shall be allowed to continue as an approved 
literacy curriculum used for instruction in the district unless the pilot program is rescinded 
pursuant to paragraph (7). 
(5) A district that participates in a pilot program pursuant to this subsection shall publicly 
post to its website any report submitted to the department with information required pursuant to 
paragraph (2) and curriculum samples. 

of 10 
(6) The department may audit approved pilot programs at any time. The audit shall 
include, but shall not be limited to: (i) an in-depth review of curriculum materials; (ii) 
instructional documentation; and (iii) instructional practices in the classroom. 
(7) The department may rescind approval of a pilot program based on audit findings 
before the expiration of the pilot program. 
Section 1E ¾. (a) The department shall provide tools and resources to aid districts in 
providing professional development aligned with evidence-based literacy instruction for literacy 
teachers, paraprofessionals and reading specialists in kindergarten through grade 3.  
(b) The department shall create and maintain: 
(i) a list of department-approved professional development programs and vendors aligned 
with evidence-based literacy instruction best practices; and  
(ii) a set of online training modules available and free to all teachers that provide training 
on the foundational practices and pedagogy aligned with evidence-based literacy instruction best 
practices. 
SECTION 3. Section 1S of said chapter 69, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is 
hereby amended by striking out, in line 41, the words “and (J)” and inserting in place thereof the 
following words:- (J) implementing literacy instructions based on evidence-based literacy 
instruction; and (K). 
SECTION 4. Said section 1S of said chapter 69, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended by inserting after the word “subgroups”, in line 48, the following words:- ; and 

of 10 
provided further, that district plans shall address implementation and compliance with section 1E 
1/2. 
SECTION 5. Said section 1S of said chapter 69, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended by adding the following 2 subsections:- 
(h)(1) Annually, not later than August 15, the department shall identify a list of data 
requirements that districts shall report on related to curricula consistent with evidence-based 
literacy instruction pursuant to section 1E 1/2. The department shall publish the list of data 
requirements on the department’s website. 
(2) Annually, not later than October 31, each district shall report to the department the 
data required by the department pursuant to paragraph (1).  
(i) Annually, not later than December 31, the department shall aggregate data collected 
from each district pursuant to subsection (h), prepare and publish a report on the aggregated data 
and file the report with the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate and the joint 
committee on education. The department shall publish the report on the department’s website. 
SECTION 6. Section 2 of chapter 70 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
amended by inserting after the definition of “Equalized property valuation” the following 
definition:- 
“Evidence-based literacy instruction”, as defined in section 1E 1/2 of chapter 69. 
SECTION 7. Said section 2 of said chapter 70, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended by inserting after the definition of “Excess effort” the following definition:- 

of 10 
“Five research-based areas in reading instruction”, as defined in section 1E ½ of chapter 
69. 
SECTION 8. Section 38G of chapter 71 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
amended by striking out the twenty-fourth paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following 
2 paragraphs:- 
For the purposes of certifying educators, the board shall establish policies and guidelines 
100 and the commissioner may approve preparation programs devoted to the preparation of teachers 
101 and other educational personnel. Said policies and guidelines shall include alignment with 
102 evidence-based literacy instruction for educator preparation programs. The department shall 
103 require a fee for any application submitted to the department for review and approval of an 
104 educator preparation program. The secretary of administration and finance shall annually set the 
105 fee pursuant to section 3B of chapter 7 and the fee shall cover the costs pursuant to this 
106 paragraph. A college or university or school or district or other institution offering such an 
107 approved program shall certify to the commissioner that a candidate has demonstrated 
108 satisfactory competence in the skills and knowledge expected of college graduates in the most 
109 advanced nations and has completed the approved program.  
110  The commissioner shall evaluate approved educator preparation programs to ensure that 
111 candidates are prepared to meet the needs of all students in the commonwealth. The 
112 commissioner shall meaningfully differentiate the performance of individual approved educator 
113 preparation program providers, including, but not limited to, quality and outcomes of candidates 
114 once they are employed. The review shall include, but shall not be limited to: (i) program 
115 implementation of evidence-based preparation in the five research-based areas in reading 

of 10 
 116 instruction; and (ii) the extent to which new teachers’ effectiveness addresses persistent 
117 disparities in achievement. The commissioner shall annually publish data on approved programs, 
118 including, but not limited to, the current approval status, enrollment, demographics of 
119 candidates, areas of licensure being pursued and employment rate of graduates. 
120  SECTION 9. Section 57A of said chapter 71, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
121 adding the following sentence:- The commissioner shall annually publish data on which 
122 screening assessments are employed by each school district, including, but not limited to, 
123 kindergarten through grade 3 literacy screening assessments and whether the screening 
124 assessments are approved by the department. 
125  SECTION 10. Said chapter 71 is hereby further amended by inserting after section 57A 
126 the following 2 sections:- 
127  Section 57B. (a) For the purposes of this section and section 57C, the term “screening 
128 assessments” shall mean tools and assessments that can be used to identify students at risk for 
129 poor academic outcomes as determined by the department. 
130  (b) The department, in consultation with the department of early education and care, shall 
131 issue guidelines to districts requiring screening procedures and protocols for reading ability and 
132 progress in literacy skills for all students in kindergarten through grade 3 using screening 
133 assessments. The guidelines shall include a threshold at which a student is determined to be 
134 “significantly below” the grade level benchmark. The commissioner shall annually publish data 
135 on which screening assessments are employed by each district to conduct reading screening. 
136  Section 57C. (a) Each district shall, not less than twice per year, assess each student’s 
137 reading ability and progress in literacy skills from kindergarten through at least grade 3, using a 

of 10 
 138 screening assessment approved by the department. The screening assessment of the student’s 
139 reading ability and progress shall be consistent with section 2 of chapter 71B, the department’s 
140 dyslexia guidelines issued pursuant to section 57A and literacy guidelines issued pursuant to 
141 section 57B. 
142  (b) If a screening assessment determines that a student is significantly below relevant 
143 grade level benchmarks in specific literacy skills, the district shall determine which actions 
144 within the general education program will meet the student’s needs, including, but not limited to, 
145 differentiated or supplementary evidence-based reading instruction and ongoing monitoring of 
146 progress. Not later than 30 days after a screening result that determines a student is significantly 
147 below the relevant grade level benchmark, the district shall inform the student’s parent or 
148 guardian of the screening results and the school’s response and shall offer the opportunity for a 
149 follow-up discussion. 
150  SECTION 11. Chapter 238 of the acts of 2024 is hereby amended by striking out section 
151 290 and inserting in place thereof the following section:- 
152  SECTION 290. (a) As used in this section, “high-needs district” shall mean a school or 
153 district with a high percentage of low-income students and English learners, which may include a 
154 school or district implementing turnaround plans.  
155  (b) The department of elementary and secondary education shall, subject to 
156 appropriation, develop and administer a pilot program, in partnership with a college, university, 
157 school, district or other institution offering a educator preparation program approved pursuant to 
158 section 38G of chapter 71 of the General Laws, for teacher apprenticeships during which 
159 participants shall complete a paid teaching apprenticeship for school years in a high-needs 

of 10 
 160 district in a classroom with a highly proficient mentor teacher. The department of elementary and 
161 secondary education shall determine qualifications of a highly proficient mentor teacher using 
162 factors, including, but not limited to, recent evaluation ratings, student growth data and 
163 demonstrated evidence-based practices. The program shall provide funds to candidates to support 
164 earning a competitive wage, including, but not limited to, support for childcare, transportation, 
165 textbooks and other core expenses, to ensure a diverse cohort are able to fully participate. 
166  (c) The department of elementary and secondary education shall promulgate regulations 
167 defining the apprenticeship and the target candidates to be admitted to the program. 
168  (d)(1) Not later than 1 year after the completion of the pilot program, the department of 
169 elementary and secondary education shall file a report with the clerks of the house of 
170 representatives and the senate and the joint committee on education on the outcome of the pilot 
171 program. The report shall include, but shall not be limited to: (i) data on the demographics of 
172 participants, participants’ licensure pass rates on the MTEL and hiring rates; and (ii) an 
173 assessment of the feasibility of applying for status as a United States Registered Apprenticeship. 
174  (2) Not later than 3 years after the completion of the pilot program, the department of 
175 elementary and secondary education shall file a report with the clerks of the house of 
176 representatives and the senate and the joint committee on education, which shall include, but 
177 shall not be limited to, an evaluation of the impact of apprentices on student outcomes as 
178 compared to teachers not participating in the pilot program using student growth measures and 
179 an assessment of the feasibility of expanding to a teacher apprenticeship for all teacher 
180 candidates or all candidates in high-needs districts. 

of 10 
 181  SECTION 12. The department of elementary and secondary education shall update or 
182 promulgate new rules and regulations as it deems necessary to implement this act. 
183  SECTION 13. School districts shall begin reporting required pursuant to paragraph (2) of 
184 subsection (h) of section 1S of chapter 69 of the General Laws in the 2026-2027 school year. 
185  SECTION 14. Not later than December 31, 2027, the department of elementary and 
186 secondary education shall submit the first report required pursuant to subsection (i) of section 1S 
187 of chapter 69 of the General Laws.